fr: Configuration des bobines mobiles: Double bobine mobile (DVC); Quadruple bobine mobile; Simple bobine mobile (SVC); Autre
tr: Ses bobini konfigürasyonu: Çift ses bobini (DVC); Dörtlü ses bobini; Tek ses bobini (SVC); Diğer
sv: Konfiguration av talspole: Dubbel talspole (DVC); Fyrdubbel talspole; Enkel talspole (SVC); Övrigt
zh-CN: 音圈配置: 双音圈 (DVC); 四音圈; 单音圈 (SVC); 其他
zh-TW: 音圈配置: 雙音圈 (DVC); 四音圈; 單音圈 (SVC); 其他
sk-SK: Konfigurácia hlasovej cievky: Dvojitá kmitacia cievka (DVC); Štvoritá kmitacia cievka; Jednoduchá kmitacia cievka (SVC); Iné
nl: Spreekspoel configuratie: Dubbele spreekspoel (DVC); Viervoudige spreekspoel; Enkele spreekspoel (SVC); Overige
hu: Hangtekercs-konfiguráció: Duplatekercses (DVC); Négytekercses; Szimpla tekercses (SVC); Egyéb
th: การกำหนดค่าคอยล์เสียง: วอยซ์คอยล์คู่ (DVC); วอยซ์คอยล์สี่ชุด; วอยซ์คอยล์เดี่ยว (SVC); อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Configuração da bobina de voz: Bobina de voz dupla (DVC); Bobina de voz quádrupla; Bobina de voz simples (SVC); Outro
cs: Konfigurace kmitací cívky: Dvojitá kmitací cívka (DVC); Čtyřnásobná kmitací cívka; Jednoduchá kmitací cívka (SVC); Jiné
es: Configuración de la bobina móvil: Bobina de voz doble (DVC); Bobina de voz cuádruple; Bobina de voz simple (SVC); Otro
de: Schwingspulenkonfiguration: Doppelschwingspule (DVC); Vierfachschwingspule; Einzelschwingspule (SVC); Sonstiges
pt-BR: Bobina de voz configuração: Bobina de voz dupla (DVC); Bobina de voz quádrupla; Bobina de voz simples (SVC); Outra
hr-HR: Konfiguracija zvučne zavojnice: Dvostruka zvučna zavojnica (DVC); Četverostruka zvučna zavojnica; Jednostruka zvučna zavojnica (SVC); Ostalo
nb: Konfigurasjon av talespole: Dobbel svingspole (DVC); Firedobbel svingspole; Enkel svingspole (SVC); Annet
da: Konfiguration af svingspole: Dobbelt svingspole (DVC); Firedobbelt svingspole; Enkelt svingspole (SVC); Andet
ja: ボイスコイル構成: デュアルボイスコイル (DVC); クアッドボイスコイル; シングルボイスコイル (SVC); その他
bg-BG: Конфигурация на звуковата бобина: Двойна звукова намотка (DVC); Четворна звукова намотка; Единична звукова намотка (SVC); Друго
ru: Конфигурация звуковых катушек: Двойная звуковая катушка (DVC); Четверная звуковая катушка; Одинарная звуковая катушка (SVC); Другое
pl: Konfiguracja cewki drgającej: Podwójna cewka drgająca (DVC); Poczwórna cewka drgająca; Pojedyncza cewka drgająca (SVC); Inne
el: Διαμόρφωση πηνίου φωνής: Διπλό πηνίο φωνής (DVC); Τετραπλό πηνίο φωνής; Μονό πηνίο φωνής (SVC); Άλλο
it: Configurazione della bobina mobile: Doppia bobina mobile (DVC); Quadrupla bobina mobile; Singola bobina mobile (SVC); Altro
en: Voice coil configuration: Dual voice coil (DVC); Quad voice coil; Single voice coil (SVC); Other
fi: Puhekelakokoonpano: Kaksoispuhekela (DVC); Neloispuhekela; Yksittäinen puhekela (SVC); Muu
ko: 보이스 코일 구성: 듀얼 보이스 코일(DVC); 쿼드 보이스 코일; 싱글 보이스 코일(SVC); 기타
lt-LT: Balso ritės konfigūracija: Dviguba garso ritė (DVC); Keturiguba garso ritė; Viena garso ritė (SVC); Kita
vi: Cấu hình cuộn dây âm thanh: Cuộn âm thanh kép (DVC); Cuộn âm thanh lõi tứ; Cuộn âm thanh đơn (SVC); Khác
sl-SI: Konfiguracija glasovne tuljave: Dvojna glasovna tuljava (DVC); Štirikratna glasovna tuljava; Enojna glasovna tuljava (SVC); Drugo
ro-RO: Configurația bobinei mobile: Bobină mobilă dublă (DVC); Bobină mobilă cvadruplă; Bobină mobilă simplă (SVC); Altele